Arkansas, session 2025, SB349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - VICTIM ASSISTANCE COORDINATORS. There is
hereby established for the Auditor of State - Victim Assistance Coordinators
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SENIOR VICTIM ASSISTANCE COORDINATOR II 6 GRADE GS11
(2) SENIOR VICTIM ASSISTANCE COORDINATOR I 4 GRADE GS10
(3) VICTIM ASSISTANCE COORDINATOR SPEC 19 GRADE GS09
(4) VICTIM ASSISTANCE COORDINATOR II 43 GRADE GS07
(5) VICTIM ASSISTANCE COORDINATOR I 38 GRADE GS05
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 110

*JAR050*
02/27/2025 2:42:27 PM JAR050

SB349
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - VICTIM ASSISTANCE COORDINATORS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Auditor of State, to be payable from the State
Central Services Fund, for personal services of the Victim Assistance
Coordinators for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,809,910
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,523,964
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $5,333,874

SECTION 3. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. VICTIM
ASSISTANCE COORDINATORS. (a) (1) Effective October 1, 2025, all victim
assistance coordinators employed by an elected or appointed prosecuting
attorney shall become state employees.
(2) The number of positions authorized by this Act equal the total number
of county and grant funded victim assistance coordinator positions in place
as of January 1, 2025.
(3) The initial allocation of the state funded victim assistance
coordinators positions for fiscal year 2026 shall be determined by the
Prosecution Coordination Commission and shall be consistent with the number
of positions in place for each judicial district as of January 1, 2025.
(b) The entry level and maximum salaries of victim assistance coordinators
shall be comparable with that established by the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act for the appropriate grade established for each position.
(c) The victim assistance coordinators shall be subject to the Uniform
Attendance and Leave Policy Act as administered by the elected prosecuting
attorney by whom they are employed.
(d) Victim assistance coordinators who convert from county or grant funded
employment to state employment and are employed from the effective date of
the Act shall have their length of service with the county recognized for
purposes of accrual rates for sick and annual leave.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from October 1,
2025 to June 30, 2026.

02/27/2025 2:42:27 PM JAR050

SB349
SECTION 4. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. EXPENSES
OF VICTIM ASSISTANCE COORDINATORS. Each county or counties within a judicial
district shall continue to bear the responsibility and expenses of providing
the cost of facilities, equipment, and supplies, at sufficient levels of
operation, but not less than amounts appropriated by ordinance in effect
January 1, 2025.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from October 1,
2025 to June 30, 2026.

SECTION 5. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General Assembly, in the
transition to a state-funded victim assistance system, to provide an
appropriation and adequate level of victim services in all areas of the
state. It is recognized by the General Assembly that in many areas of the
state, resources have not been available to support victim services at the
necessary level to comply with statutory requirements and other duties as
assigned by the prosecuting attorney. With the transition of local funding
of victim assistance coordinator salaries to state funding, it is not the
intent of the General Assembly to adversely affect those districts whose
system has been working well or to implement a system which is too inflexible
to respond to the needs of each judicial district. Therefore, the
Prosecution Coordination Commission is charged with the responsibility of
assisting in the maintenance of a system which equitably serves all areas of
the state by providing quality victim assistance coordinators.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from October 1,
2025 to June 30, 2026.

SECTION 6. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
02/27/2025 2:42:27 PM JAR050

SB349
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is effective on and after October
1, 2025






















02/27/2025 2:42:27 PM JAR050